Alaska, session 34, HB365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 44.33.020(a) is amended to read: 07 (a) The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 08 shall 09 (1) advise and assist local governments; 10 (2) advise the governor and other commissioners on the delivery of 11 government services to rural areas, including services relating to public safety, justice, 12 economic development, natural resource management, education, and public health; 13 (3) make recommendations to the governor and other commissioners 14 about policy changes that would affect rural governments and rural affairs; 01 (4) serve as staff for the Local Boundary Commission; 02 (5) conduct studies and carry out experimental and pilot projects for 03 the purpose of developing solutions to community and regional problems; 04 (6) promote cooperative solutions to problems affecting more than one 05 community or region, including joint service agreements, regional compacts, and other 06 forms of cooperation; 07 (7) serve as a clearinghouse for information useful in solution of 08 community and regional problems, and channel to the appropriate authority requests 09 for information and services; 10 (8) advise and assist community and regional governments on matters 11 of finance, including but not limited to bond marketing and procurement of federal 12 funds; 13 (9) prepare suggested guidelines relating to the content of notice of 14 bond sale advertisements, prospectuses, and other bonding matters issued by local 15 governments; 16 (10) administer state funds appropriated for the benefit of unorganized 17 regions within the state, allowing for maximum participation by local advisory 18 councils and similar bodies; 19 (11) as assigned through a delegation by the governor, administer and 20 implement the state's role in the federal community development quota program 21 established under 16 U.S.C. 1855(i) or a successor federal program; the department 22 may adopt regulations under a delegation from the governor to implement duties under 23 this paragraph; 24 (12) carry out those administrative functions in the unorganized 25 borough that the legislature may prescribe; 26 (13) study existing and proposed laws and state activities that affect 27 community and regional affairs and submit to the governor recommended changes in 28 those laws and activities; 29 (14) coordinate activities of the state that affect community and 30 regional affairs; 31 (15) assist in the development of new communities and serve as the 01 agent of the state for purposes of participation in federal programs relating to new 02 communities; 03 (16) supervise planning, management, and other activities required for 04 local eligibility for financial aid under those federal and state programs that provide 05 assistance to community and regional governments; 06 (17) advise and assist municipalities on procedures of assessment, 07 valuation, and taxation, and notify municipalities of major errors in those procedures; 08 (18) apply for, receive, and use funds from federal and other sources, 09 public or private, for use in carrying out the powers and duties of the department; 10 (19) request and utilize the resources of other agencies of state 11 government in carrying out the purposes of this chapter to the extent the utilization is 12 more efficient than maintaining departmental staff, reimbursing the other agencies 13 when appropriate; 14 (20) administer state and, as appropriate, federal programs for revenue 15 sharing, community assistance, grants, and other forms of financial assistance to 16 community and regional governments; 17 (21) administer the state programs relating to commerce or community 18 development, enforce the laws relating to these programs, and adopt regulations under 19 these laws; 20 (22) register corporations; 21 (23) collect corporation franchise taxes; 22 (24) enforce state laws regulating public utilities and other public 23 service enterprises, banking and securities, insurance, and other businesses and 24 enterprises touched with a public interest; 25 (25) make veterans' loans; 26 (26) furnish the budgeting, clerical, and administrative services for 27 regulatory agencies and professional and occupational licensing boards not otherwise 28 provided for; 29 (27) conduct studies, enter into contracts and agreements, and make 30 surveys relating to the economic development of the state and, when appropriate, 31 assemble, analyze, and disseminate the findings obtained; 01 (28) provide factual information and technical assistance for potential 02 industrial and commercial investors; 03 (29) receive gifts, grants, and other aid that facilitate the powers and 04 duties of the department from agencies and instrumentalities of the United States or 05 other public or private sources; 06 (30) establish and activate programs to achieve balanced economic 07 development in the state and advise the governor on economic development policy 08 matters; 09 (31) formulate a continuing program for basic economic development 10 and for the necessary promotion, planning, and research that will advance the 11 economic development of the state; 12 (32) cooperate with private, governmental, and other public institutions 13 and agencies in the execution of economic development programs; 14 (33) review the programs and annual reports of other departments and 15 agencies as they are related to economic development and prepare an annual report on 16 the economic growth of the state; 17 (34) administer the economic development programs of the state; 18 (35) perform all other duties and powers necessary or proper in 19 relation to economic development and planning for the state; 20 (36) request tourism-related businesses in the state to provide data 21 regarding occupancy levels, traffic flow, and gross receipts and to participate in visitor 22 surveys conducted by the department; data collected under this paragraph that 23 discloses the particulars of an individual business is not a matter of public record and 24 shall be kept confidential; however, this restriction does not prevent the department 25 from using the data to formulate tourism economic impact information including 26 expenditure patterns, tax receipts and fees, employment and income attributable to 27 tourism, and other information considered relevant to the planning, evaluation, and 28 policy direction of tourism in the state; 29 (37) provide administrative and budgetary services to the Real Estate 30 Commission under AS 08.88 as requested by the commission; 31 (38) sell at cost, to the extent possible, publications and promotional 01 materials developed by the department; 02 (39) as delegated by the governor, administer under 16 U.S.C. 1856 03 the internal waters foreign processing permit procedures and collect related fees; 04 (40) administer state laws relating to the issuance of business licenses; 05 (41) comply with AS 15.07.055 to serve as a voter registration agency 06 to the extent required by state and federal law, including 42 U.S.C. 1973gg (National 07 Voter Registration Act of 1993); 08 (42) carry out other functions and duties, consistent with law, 09 necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purpose of this chapter; 10 (43) oversee the administration of outstanding loans and financial 11 assistance under the Alaska BIDCO assistance program under former AS 37.17.500 - 12 37.17.690; 13 (44) supply necessary clerical and administrative services for the 14 Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and the Marijuana Control Board; 15 (45) cooperate with the federal government and do all things 16 necessary to participate in the federal tax credit program established under 26 17 U.S.C. 25F for qualified contributions to a scholarship granting organization, 18 including identifying scholarship granting organizations in the state in 19 accordance with 26 U.S.C. 25F(g). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.